District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-3315

Offenses against property of electric lighting, heating, or power companies

Repealed.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(pp)-(rr), 29 DCR 3976

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-3115 to 22-3117.